District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.01

Repealed

Short title.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 179, ch. 269, § 1
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(a), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-301.
1973 Ed., § 29-901.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Cooperative Association Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-203, December 2, 1997, 44 DCR 7498).

Applicability date of D.C. Law 18-378: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-378, as amended by section 7082 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided:

“Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.”

Note Regarding Enactment of Title 29

D.C. Law 18-378 amended and enacted into law Title 29 of the District of Columbia.